pt-BR: Contador de carreiras formato: Corrente; Digital; Contador de mão tipo clicker; Anel para agulha; Inteligente/conectado a app; Outro
tr: Satır sayacı formatı: Zincir; Dijital; El tipi sayaç; Şiş halkası; Akıllı/uygulama bağlantılı; Diğer
el: Τύπος μετρητή σειρών: Αλυσίδα; Ψηφιακό; Μετρητής χειρός (clicker); Δακτύλιος βελόνας; Έξυπνο/Με σύνδεση σε εφαρμογή; Άλλο
nl: Rijenteller formaat: Ketting; Digitaal; Handklikker; Naaldring; Smart/app-verbonden; Overige
en: Row counter format: Chain; Digital; Handheld clicker; Needle ring; Smart/app-connected; Other
pt-PT: Formato do contador de carreiras: Corrente; Digital; Clicker manual; Anel para agulhas; Inteligente/com ligação a app; Outro
fr: Format du compte-rangs: Chaîne; Numérique; Compteur manuel; Anneau d’aiguille; Intelligent/connecté à une appli; Autre
cs: Formát počítadla řádků: Řetízek; Digitální; Ruční klikr; Kroužek na jehlici; Chytrý / s aplikací; Jiné
es: Formato del contador de hileras: Cadena; Digital; Clicador de mano; Anillo para aguja; Inteligente/conectado a app; Otro
zh-CN: 行计数器样式: 链条式; 数字式; 手持按压器; 针环式; 智能/应用连接; 其他
vi: Định dạng bộ đếm hàng: Dây xích; Kỹ thuật số; Máy bấm đếm cầm tay; Vòng xỏ kim; Thông minh/Kết nối ứng dụng; Khác
sk-SK: Formát počítadla riadkov: Retiazka; Digitálny; Ručné klikadlo; Krúžok na ihlicu; Smart/pripojené k aplikácii; Iné
da: Rækketællerformat: Kæde; Digital; Håndholdt klikker; Strikkepindering; Smart/app-tilsluttet; Andet
sv: Radräknarformat: Kedja; Digital; Handhållen klickare; Stickring; Smart/app-ansluten; Övrigt
nb: Radtellerformat: Kjede; Digital; Håndholdt klikker; Pinnering; Smart / app-tilkoblet; Annet
th: รูปแบบตัวนับแถว: โซ่; ดิจิทัล; เครื่องนับมือกด; ห่วงสวมเข็ม; อัจฉริยะ/เชื่อมต่อแอป; อื่นๆ
zh-TW: 行數計數器格式: 鍊條; 數位; 手持計數器; 針環; 智慧型/連線至 app; 其他
ko: 행 카운터 형식: 체인; 디지털; 휴대용 클리커; 바늘 링; 스마트/앱 연동; 기타
it: Formato del contatore di ferri: A catenella; Digitale; Contapunti manuale; Ad anello per ferro; Smart/connesso ad app; Altro
hu: Sorszámláló formátuma: Lánc; Digitális; Kézi számláló; Kötőtűgyűrű; Okos / alkalmazáshoz csatlakoztatott; Egyéb
fi: Kerroslaskurin muoto: Ketju; Digitaalinen; Käsikäyttöinen naksutin; Puikkorengas; Äly/sovellukseen yhdistettävä; Muu
lt-LT: Eilių skaitiklio formatas: Grandinėlė; Skaitmeninis; Rankinis spragtukas; Ant virbalo maunamas žiedas; Išmanusis / prijungiamas prie programėlės; Kita
de: Format des Reihenzählers: Kette; Digital; Hand-Klicker; Nadelring; Smart/App-verbunden; Sonstige
ro-RO: Format al numărătorului de rânduri: Lanț; Digital; Clicker manual; Inel pentru andrea; Inteligent/conectat la aplicație; Altele
ru: Формат счетчика рядов: Цепочка; Цифровой; Ручной кликер; Кольцо на спицу; Умный/с подключением к приложению; Другое
sl-SI: Format števca vrstic: Verižica; Digitalen; Ročni kliker; Obroček za iglo; Pameten/povezan z aplikacijo; Drugo
hr-HR: Format brojača redaka: Lanac; Digitalni; Ručni kliker; Prsten za iglu; Pametni / povezan s aplikacijom; Ostalo
bg-BG: Формат на брояча на редове: Верижка; Дигитален; Ръчен кликер; Пръстен за игла; Смарт/свързан с приложение; Друго
pl: Format licznika rzędów: Łańcuszek; Cyfrowy; Ręczny licznik mechaniczny (klikacz); Kółko na drut; Inteligentny / połączony z aplikacją; Inny
ja: 段数カウンター形式: チェーン; デジタル; 手持ちクリッカー; ニードルリング; スマート / アプリ連携; その他